Maine, session 132, LD794.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §17851-A, sub-§1, ¶P, as amended by PL 2021, c. 474, §4, is
further amended to read:
P. Detectives in the employment of the Office of the Attorney General on July 1, 2020
who elect to participate in the 1998 Special Plan or hired thereafter; and
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §17851-A, sub-§1, ¶Q, as amended by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. IIII,
§1, is further amended to read:
Q. Until July 31, 2024, civilian employees whose job responsibilities include the
handling, examination or analysis of digital or physical evidence in the employment of
the Department of Public Safety, Maine State Police Crime Laboratory or computer
crimes unit on October 1, 2021 or hired thereafter.; and
Sec. 3. 5 MRSA §17851-A, sub-§1, ¶R is enacted to read:
R. Judicial marshals as defined in Title 25, section 2801-A, subsection 2-A in the
employment of the judicial branch on October 1, 2025 or hired thereafter.
Sec. 4. 5 MRSA §17851-A, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2021, c. 474, §6, is further
amended to read:
2. Qualification for benefits. A member employed in any one or a combination of
the capacities specified in subsection 1 after June 30, 1998 and before September 1, 2002
for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs A and B; after June 30, 1998 for
employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs C to H; after December 31, 1999 for
employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs I to K; any employee identified in
subsection 1, paragraph M; after June 30, 2020 for employees identified in subsection 1,
paragraphs N to P; after September 30, 2021 for employees identified in subsection 1,
paragraph Q; after September 30, 2025 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph
R; and any employee identified in subsection 1, paragraph L, qualifies for a service
retirement benefit if that member either:
A. Is at least 55 years of age and has completed at least 10 years of creditable service
under the 1998 Special Plan in any one or a combination of the capacities; or
B. Has completed at least 25 years of creditable service in any one or a combination
of the capacities specified in subsection 1, whether or not the creditable service
included in determining that the 25-year requirement has been met was earned under
the 1998 Special Plan or prior to its establishment.
Sec. 5. 5 MRSA §17851-A, sub-§3, ¶A, as amended by PL 2021, c. 474, §7, is
further amended by amending subparagraph (1) to read:
(1) Service credit purchased by repayment of an earlier refund of accumulated
contributions following termination of service is included only to the extent that
time to which the refund relates was served after June 30, 1998 and before
September 1, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs A and B;
after June 30, 1998 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs C to H;
after December 31, 1999 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs I to
K; after June 30, 2020 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs N to P;
and after September 30, 2021 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph
Page 1 - 132LR0574(01)

413 Q in any one or a combination of the capacities specified in subsection 1. Service
424 credit may be purchased for service by an employee identified in subsection 1,
435 paragraphs L and, M and R regardless of when performed; and
Sec. 6. 5 MRSA §17851-A, sub-§4, ¶A, as amended by PL 2021, c. 474, §8, is
further amended to read:
A. If all of the member's creditable service in any one or a combination of the
capacities specified in subsection 1 was earned after June 30, 1998 and before
September 1, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs A and B; after
June 30, 1998 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs C to H; after
December 31, 1999 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs I to K; after
December 31, 2001 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph L; after June
30, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph M; after June 30, 2020
for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs N to P; and after September 30,
2021 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph Q; and after September 30,
2025 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph R; if service credit was
purchased by repayment of an earlier refund of accumulated contributions for service
in any one or a combination of the capacities specified in subsection 1 after June 30,
1998 and before September 1, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1,
paragraphs A and B; after June 30, 1998 for employees identified in subsection 1,
paragraphs C to H; after December 31, 1999 for employees identified in subsection 1,
paragraphs I to K; after December 31, 2001 for employees identified in subsection 1,
paragraph L; after June 30, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph
M; after June 30, 2020 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs N to P; and
after September 30, 2021 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph Q; and
after September 30, 2025 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph R; or if
service credit was purchased by other than the repayment of an earlier refund and
eligibility to make the purchase of the service credit, including, but not limited to,
service credit for military service, was achieved after June 30, 1998 and before
September 1, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs A and B; after
June 30, 1998 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs C to H; after
December 31, 1999 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs I to K; after
December 31, 2001 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph L; after June
30, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph M; after June 30, 2020
for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs N to P; and after September 30,
2021 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph Q; and after September 30,
2025 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph R, the benefit must be
computed as provided in section 17852, subsection 1, paragraph A.
(1) If the member had 10 years of creditable service on July 1, 1993, the benefit
under subsection 2, paragraph B must be reduced as provided in section 17852,
subsection 3, paragraphs A and B.
(2) If the member had fewer than 10 years of creditable service on July 1, 1993,
the benefit under subsection 2, paragraph B must be reduced by 6% for each year
that the member's age precedes 55 years of age.
Sec. 7. 5 MRSA §17851-A, sub-§4, ¶B, as amended by PL 2021, c. 474, §9, is
further amended to read:
Page 2 - 132LR0574(01)

B. Except as provided in paragraphs D, E and, F and G, if some part of the member's
creditable service in any one or a combination of the capacities specified in subsection
1 was earned before July 1, 1998 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs
A to H; before January 1, 2000 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs I
to K; before January 1, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph L;
before July 1, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph M; before July
1, 2020 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs N to P; and before October
1, 2021 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph Q; and before October 1,
2025 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph R and some part of the
member's creditable service in any one or a combination of the capacities specified in
subsection 1 was earned after June 30, 1998 and before September 1, 2002 for
employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs A and B; after June 30, 1998 for
employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs C to H; after December 31, 1999 for
employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs I to K; after December 31, 2001 for
employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph L; after June 30, 2002 for employees
identified in subsection 1, paragraph M; after June 30, 2020 for employees identified
in subsection 1, paragraphs N to P; and after September 30, 2021 for employees
identified in subsection 1, paragraph Q; and after September 30, 2025 for employees
identified in subsection 1, paragraph R, then the member's service retirement benefit
must be computed in segments and the amount of the member's service retirement
benefit is the sum of the segments. The segments must be computed as follows:
(1) The segment or, if the member served in more than one of the capacities
specified in subsection 1 and the benefits related to the capacities are not
interchangeable under section 17856, segments that reflect creditable service
earned before July 1, 1998 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs A
to H; before January 1, 2000 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs
I to K; before January 1, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph
L; before July 1, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph M;
before July 1, 2020 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs N to P;
and before October 1, 2021 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph Q;
and before October 1, 2025 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph R
or purchased by repayment of an earlier refund of accumulated contributions for
service before July 1, 1998, for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs
A to H; before January 1, 2000 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs
I to K; before January 1, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph
L; before July 1, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph M;
before July 1, 2020 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs N to P;
and before October 1, 2021 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph Q;
and before October 1, 2025 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph R
in a capacity or capacities specified in subsection 1 or purchased by other than the
repayment of a refund and eligibility to make the purchase of the service credit,
including, but not limited to, service credit for military service, was achieved
before July 1, 1998 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs A to H;
before January 1, 2000 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs I to K;
before January 1, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph L;
before July 1, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph M; before
July 1, 2020 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs N to P; and before
Page 3 - 132LR0574(01)

418 October 1, 2021 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph Q; and before
429 October 1, 2025 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph R, must be
530 computed under section 17852, subsection 1, paragraph A. If the member is
541 qualified under subsection 2, paragraph B and:
(a) Had 10 years of creditable service on July 1, 1993, the amount of the
segment or segments must be reduced as provided in section 17852, subsection
3, paragraphs A and B; or
(b) Had fewer than 10 years of creditable service on July 1, 1993, the amount
of the segment or segments must be reduced as provided in section 17852,
subsection 3‑A; and
(2) The segment that reflects creditable service earned after June 30, 1998 and
before September 1, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs A
and B; after June 30, 1998 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs C
to H; after December 31, 1999 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs
I to K; after December 31, 2001 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph
L; after June 30, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph M; after
June 30, 2020 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs N to P; and
after September 30, 2021 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph Q;
and after September 30, 2025 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph
R or purchased by repayment of an earlier refund of accumulated contributions for
service after June 30, 1998 and before September 1, 2002 for employees identified
in subsection 1, paragraphs A and B; after June 30, 1998 for employees identified
in subsection 1, paragraphs C to H; after December 31, 1999 for employees
identified in subsection 1, paragraphs I to K; after December 31, 2001 for
employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph L; after June 30, 2002 for
employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph M; after June 30, 2020 for
employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs N to P; and after September 30,
2021 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph Q; and after September
30, 2025 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph R in any one or a
combination of the capacities specified in subsection 1, or purchased by other than
the repayment of a refund and eligibility to make the purchase of the service credit,
including, but not limited to, service credit for military service, was achieved after
June 30, 1998 and before September 1, 2002 for employees identified in subsection
1, paragraphs A and B; after June 30, 1998 for employees identified in subsection
1, paragraphs C to H; after December 31, 1999 for employees identified in
subsection 1, paragraphs I to K; after December 31, 2001 for employees identified
in subsection 1, paragraph L; after June 30, 2002 for employees identified in
subsection 1, paragraph M; after June 30, 2020 for employees identified in
subsection 1, paragraphs N to P; and after September 30, 2021 for employees
identified in subsection 1, paragraph Q; and after September 30, 2025 for
employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph R must be computed under section
17852, subsection 1, paragraph A. If the member is qualified under subsection 2,
paragraph B and:
(a) Had 10 years of creditable service on July 1, 1993, the segment amount
must be reduced in the manner provided in section 17852, subsection 3,
Page 4 - 132LR0574(01)

416 paragraphs A and B for each year that the member's age precedes 55 years of
427 age; or
(b) Had fewer than 10 years of creditable service on July 1, 1993, the segment
amount must be reduced by 6% for each year that the member's age precedes
55 years of age.
Sec. 8. 5 MRSA §17851-A, sub-§4, ¶G is enacted to read:
G. The service retirement benefit of a member to whom subsection 1, paragraph R
applies and who qualifies for service retirement benefits under subsection 2 must be
computed under section 17852, subsection 1, paragraph A on the basis of all of the
member's creditable service in the capacity specified in subsection 1, paragraph R,
regardless of when that creditable service was earned, except that for a member
qualifying under subsection 2, paragraph B:
(1) If the member had 10 years of service on July 1, 1993, the benefit must be
reduced as provided in section 17852, subsection 3, paragraphs A and B for each
year the member's age precedes 55 years of age; or
(2) If the member had fewer than 10 years of creditable service on July 1, 1993,
the benefit must be reduced by 6% for each year that the member's age precedes
55 years of age.
Sec. 9. 5 MRSA §17851-A, sub-§5, as amended by PL 2021, c. 474, §10, is further
amended to read:
5. Contributions. Notwithstanding any other provision of subchapter 3 to the
contrary, after June 30, 1998 and before September 1, 2002 for employees identified in
subsection 1, paragraphs A and B; after June 30, 1998 for employees identified in
subsection 1, paragraphs C to H; after December 31, 1999 for employees identified in
subsection 1, paragraphs I to K; after December 31, 2001 for employees identified in
subsection 1, paragraph L; after June 30, 2002 for employees identified in subsection 1,
paragraph M; after June 30, 2020 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraphs N
to P; and after September 30, 2021 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph Q;
and after September 30, 2025 for employees identified in subsection 1, paragraph R, a
member in the capacities specified in subsection 1 must contribute to the State Employee
and Teacher Retirement Program or have pick-up contributions made at the rate of 8.65%
of earnable compensation until the member has completed 25 years of creditable service as
provided in this section and at the rate of 7.65% thereafter.
Sec. 10. Maine Public Employees Retirement System report. The Maine
Public Employees Retirement System shall submit a report to the Joint Standing Committee
on Labor no later than December 3, 2025. The report must include the number of judicial
marshals enrolled in the 1998 Special Plan and any recommendations for legislation. The
Joint Standing Committee on Labor may report out a bill to the Second Regular Session of
the 132nd Legislature to implement the recommendations of the report.